Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 13.2. Standards of Quality.
§ 22.1-253.13:5.
(For Expiration Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 550, cl. 2) Standard 5. Quality of classroom instruction and educational leadership.

Each member of the Board of Education shall participate in high-quality professional development programs on personnel, curriculum and current issues in education as part of his service on the Board.

Consistent with the finding that leadership is essential for the advancement of public education in the Commonwealth, teacher, principal, and superintendent evaluations shall be consistent with the performance standards included in the Guidelines for Uniform Performance Standards and Evaluation Criteria for Teachers, Principals, and Superintendents. Evaluations shall include student academic progress as a significant component and an overall summative rating. Teacher evaluations shall include regular observation and evidence that instruction is aligned with the school’s curriculum. Evaluations shall include identification of areas of individual strengths and weaknesses and recommendations for appropriate professional activities. Evaluations shall include an evaluation of cultural competency.

The Board of Education shall provide guidance on high-quality professional development for (i) teachers, principals, supervisors, division superintendents, and other school staff; (ii) principals, supervisors, and division superintendents in the evaluation and documentation of teacher and principal performance based on student academic progress and the skills and knowledge of such instructional or administrative personnel; (iii) school board members on personnel, curriculum and current issues in education; and (iv) programs in Braille for teachers of the blind and visually impaired, in cooperation with the Virginia Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired.The Board shall also provide technical assistance on high-quality professional development to local school boards designed to ensure that all instructional personnel are proficient in the use of educational technology consistent with its comprehensive plan for educational technology.

Each local school board shall require (i) its members to participate annually in high-quality professional development activities at the state, local, or national levels on governance, including, but not limited to, personnel policies and practices; the evaluation of personnel, curriculum, and instruction; use of data in planning and decision making; and current issues in education as part of their service on the local board and (ii) the division superintendent to participate annually in high-quality professional development activities at the local, state, or national levels, including the Standards of Quality, Board of Education regulations, and the Guidelines for Uniform Performance Standards and Evaluation Criteria for Teachers, Principals, and Superintendents.

Each local school board shall provide a program of high-quality professional development (i) in the use and documentation of performance standards and evaluation criteria based on student academic progress and skills for teachers, principals, and superintendents to clarify roles and performance expectations and to facilitate the successful implementation of instructional programs that promote student achievement at the school and classroom levels; (ii) as part of the license renewal process, to assist teachers and principals in acquiring the skills needed to work with gifted students, students with disabilities, and students who have been identified as having limited English proficiency and to increase student achievement and expand the knowledge and skills students require to meet the standards for academic performance set by the Board of Education; (iii) in educational technology for all instructional personnel which is designed to facilitate integration of computer skills and related technology into the curricula; and (iv) for principals and supervisors designed to increase proficiency in instructional leadership and management, including training in the evaluation and documentation of teacher and principal performance based on student academic progress and the skills and knowledge of such instructional or administrative personnel.In addition, each local school board shall also provide teachers and principals with high-quality professional development programs each year in (a) instructional content; (b) the preparation of tests and other assessment measures; (c) methods for assessing the progress of individual students, including Standards of Learning assessment materials or other criterion-referenced tests that match locally developed objectives; (d) instruction and remediation techniques in English, mathematics, science, and history and social science; (e) interpreting test data for instructional purposes; (f) technology applications to implement the Standards of Learning; and (g) effective classroom management.

Schools and school divisions shall include as an integral component of their comprehensive plans required by § 22.1-253.13:6, high-quality professional development programs that support the recruitment, employment, and retention of qualified teachers and principals. Each school board shall require all instructional personnel to participate each year in these professional development programs.

Each local school board shall annually review its professional development program for quality, effectiveness, participation by instructional personnel, and relevancy to the instructional needs of teachers and the academic achievement needs of the students in the school division.

History.

1988, cc. 645, 682; 1990, cc. 820, 839; 1992, c. 132; 1997, c. 827; 1998, cc. 826, 852; 1999, cc. 830, 1030, 1037; 2000, c. 867; 2004, cc. 939, 955; 2005, cc. 331, 450; 2007, c. 234; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 23, 24.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s notes under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

Acts 2013, c. 726, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Board of Education shall amend its regulations to require any individual licensed and endorsed to teach (i) middle school civics or economics, or (ii) high school government or history who is seeking renewal of such license to demonstrate knowledge of Virginia history or state and local government by completing a module or professional development course specifically related to Virginia history or state and local government that has a value of five professional development points. This requirement shall apply for purposes of the individual’s next or initial renewal occurring after July 1, 2014.”

Acts 2013, c. 726, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective by July 1, 2014.”

Acts
2022, cc. 549 and
550, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective beginning with the 2024-2025 school year.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 830, in subsection A, deleted “effective education leadership and personnel and appropriate” following “find that,” inserted “and appropriate teacher performance evaluations,” and inserted “for effective educational leadership and personnel and.”

The 1999 amendments by cc. 1030 and 1037 are identical, and added the language beginning “which standards shall include” in subsection C; in subsection D, inserted the present clause (ii), and redesignated former clauses (ii) and (iii) as present clauses (iii) and (iv); and added the language “including training in the evaluation” in subsection F.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 867, in the second paragraph of subsection D, inserted “also” preceding “provide”, and deleted “seek to” preceding “ensure”; and added “which is designed to facilitate integration of computer skills and related technology into the curricula” at the end of clause F (ii).

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 331 and 450 are identical, and rewrote subsection B; substituted “comprehensive plan for education technology” for “Six Year Educational Technology Plan for Virginia” in the second paragraph of subsection C; in subsection D, rewrote clause (i) in the first paragraph and inserted clause (i) in the second paragraph; rewrote subsection F; added subsection G; and made related changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 234 added clause (vii) at the end of the second paragraph of subsection E and made a related change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “principal” for “administrator,” “standards” for “objectives,” and “Principals” for “Administrators” in the first sentence, and inserted the second sentence; substituted “principals, supervisors, and division superintendents” for “administrative and supervisory personnel” and “principal” for “administrator” in clause C (ii); inserted “the evaluation of personnel” in clause D (i) and “including the Standards of Quality, Board of Education regulations, and the Guidelines for Uniform Performance Standards and Evaluation Criteria for Teachers, Principals, and Superintendents” in clause D (ii); substituted “principals, and superintendents” in clause E (i); substituted “principals and supervisors” for “administrative personnel” and “principal performance” for “administrator performance” in clause E (iv); and in the second paragraph of subsection E, redesignated former clauses (i) through (vii) as clauses (a) through (g).

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 23 and 24, effective July 1, 2021, are identical and added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 549 and 550 are identical, and in subsection C, in clause (iv) of the first paragraph, deleted “programs in Braille for”, added “in Braille; and”, added clause (v), and added the last paragraph; substituted “shall provide” for “shall also provide teachers” in the second paragraph of subsection E; added the subdivision E 1 designation; added subdivision E 2; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Education Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 103 (2013).

§ 22.1-253.13:5.
(For Effective Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 550, cl. 2) Standard 5. Quality of classroom instruction and educational leadership.

Each member of the Board of Education shall participate in high-quality professional development programs on personnel, curriculum and current issues in education as part of his service on the Board.

Consistent with the finding that leadership is essential for the advancement of public education in the Commonwealth, teacher, principal, and superintendent evaluations shall be consistent with the performance standards included in the Guidelines for Uniform Performance Standards and Evaluation Criteria for Teachers, Principals, and Superintendents. Evaluations shall include student academic progress as a significant component and an overall summative rating. Teacher evaluations shall include regular observation and evidence that instruction is aligned with the school’s curriculum. Evaluations shall include identification of areas of individual strengths and weaknesses and recommendations for appropriate professional activities. Evaluations shall include an evaluation of cultural competency.

The Board of Education shall provide guidance on high-quality professional development for (i) teachers, principals, supervisors, division superintendents, and other school staff; (ii) principals, supervisors, and division superintendents in the evaluation and documentation of teacher and principal performance based on student academic progress and the skills and knowledge of such instructional or administrative personnel; (iii) school board members on personnel, curriculum and current issues in education; (iv) teachers of the blind and visually impaired, in cooperation with the Virginia Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired, in Braille; and (v) any individual with an endorsement in early/primary education preschool through grade three, elementary education preschool through grade six, special education general curriculum kindergarten through grade 12, special education deaf and hard of hearing preschool through grade 12, or special education blindness/visual impairments preschool through grade 12 or as a reading specialist in science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction.

The Board shall also provide technical assistance on high-quality professional development to local school boards designed to ensure that all instructional personnel are proficient in the use of educational technology consistent with its comprehensive plan for educational technology.

The Department shall provide technical assistance, including literacy coaching, to local school divisions to provide professional development in science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction. The Department shall also create a list of professional development programs aligned with science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction that includes programs that provide training in dyslexia for reading specialists as required by subsection G of § 22.1-253.13:2. The list shall be approved by the Board. The Department shall provide resources to local school divisions to ensure that each division is able to provide professional development to teachers and reading specialists listed in subdivision E 2 of § 22.1-253.13:5 in one of the programs enumerated in the list approved by the Board pursuant to this subdivision and that such professional development is provided at no cost to the teachers and reading specialists.

Each local school board shall require (i) its members to participate annually in high-quality professional development activities at the state, local, or national levels on governance, including, but not limited to, personnel policies and practices; the evaluation of personnel, curriculum, and instruction; use of data in planning and decision making; and current issues in education as part of their service on the local board and (ii) the division superintendent to participate annually in high-quality professional development activities at the local, state, or national levels, including the Standards of Quality, Board of Education regulations, and the Guidelines for Uniform Performance Standards and Evaluation Criteria for Teachers, Principals, and Superintendents.

Each local school board shall provide a program of high-quality professional development (i) in the use and documentation of performance standards and evaluation criteria based on student academic progress and skills for teachers, principals, and superintendents to clarify roles and performance expectations and to facilitate the successful implementation of instructional programs that promote student achievement at the school and classroom levels; (ii) as part of the license renewal process, to assist teachers and principals in acquiring the skills needed to work with gifted students, students with disabilities, and students who have been identified as having limited English proficiency and to increase student achievement and expand the knowledge and skills students require to meet the standards for academic performance set by the Board of Education; (iii) in educational technology for all instructional personnel which is designed to facilitate integration of computer skills and related technology into the curricula; and (iv) for principals and supervisors designed to increase proficiency in instructional leadership and management, including training in the evaluation and documentation of teacher and principal performance based on student academic progress and the skills and knowledge of such instructional or administrative personnel.

In addition, each local school board shall provide:

Teachers and principals with high-quality professional development programs each year in (a) instructional content; (b) the preparation of tests and other assessment measures; (c) methods for assessing the progress of individual students, including Standards of Learning assessment materials or other criterion-referenced tests that match locally developed objectives; (d) instruction and remediation techniques in English, mathematics, science, and history and social science; (e) interpreting test data for instructional purposes; (f) technology applications to implement the Standards of Learning; and (g) effective classroom management; and

High-quality professional development and training in science-based reading research and evidence-based literacy instruction, from the list developed and the resources provided by the Department pursuant to subsection C of § 22.1-253.13:5 or an alternative program that consists of evidence-based literacy instruction and aligns with science-based reading research approved by the Department, for each elementary school principal and each teacher with an endorsement in early/primary education preschool through grade three, elementary education preschool through grade six, special education general curriculum kindergarten through grade 12, special education deaf and hard of hearing preschool through grade 12, or special education blindness/visual impairments preschool through grade 12 or as a reading specialist in order to aid in the licensure renewal process for such individuals.

Schools and school divisions shall include as an integral component of their comprehensive plans required by § 22.1-253.13:6, high-quality professional development programs that support the recruitment, employment, and retention of qualified teachers and principals. Each school board shall require all instructional personnel to participate each year in these professional development programs.

Each local school board shall annually review its professional development program for quality, effectiveness, participation by instructional personnel, and relevancy to the instructional needs of teachers and the academic achievement needs of the students in the school division.

History.

1988, cc. 645, 682; 1990, cc. 820, 839; 1992, c. 132; 1997, c. 827; 1998, cc. 826, 852; 1999, cc. 830, 1030, 1037; 2000, c. 867; 2004, cc. 939, 955; 2005, cc. 331, 450; 2007, c. 234; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 23, 24; 2022, cc. 549, 550.

§ 22.1-253.13:6.
(For Expiration Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 550, cl. 2) Standard 6. Planning and public involvement.

The Board of Education shall adopt a statewide comprehensive, unified, long-range plan based on data collection, analysis, and evaluation. Such plan shall be developed with statewide participation. The Board shall review the plan biennially and adopt any necessary revisions. The Board shall post the plan on the Department of Education’s website if practicable, and, in any case, shall make a hard copy of such plan available for public inspection and copying.This plan shall include the objectives of public education in Virginia, including strategies for first improving student achievement, particularly the achievement of educationally at-risk students, then maintaining high levels of student achievement; an assessment of the extent to which these objectives are being achieved; a forecast of enrollment changes; and an assessment of the needs of public education in the Commonwealth. In the annual report required by § 22.1-18, the Board shall include an analysis of the extent to which these Standards of Quality have been achieved and the objectives of the statewide comprehensive plan have been met. The Board shall also develop, consistent with, or as a part of, its comprehensive plan, a detailed comprehensive, long-range plan to integrate educational technology into the Standards of Learning and the curricula of the public schools in Virginia, including career and technical education programs. The Board shall review and approve the comprehensive plan for educational technology and may require the revision of such plan as it deems necessary.

Each local school board shall adopt a divisionwide comprehensive, unified, long-range plan based on data collection, an analysis of the data, and how the data will be utilized to improve classroom instruction and student achievement. The plan shall be developed with staff and community involvement and shall include, or be consistent with, all other divisionwide plans required by state and federal laws and regulations. Each local school board shall review the plan biennially and adopt any necessary revisions. Prior to the adoption of any divisionwide comprehensive plan or revisions thereto, each local school board shall post such plan or revisions on the division’s Internet website if practicable, and, in any case, shall make a hard copy of the plan or revisions available for public inspection and copying and shall conduct at least one public hearing to solicit public comment on the divisionwide plan or revisions.The divisionwide comprehensive plan shall include, but shall not be limited to, (i) the objectives of the school division, including strategies for first improving student achievement, particularly the achievement of educationally at-risk students, then maintaining high levels of student achievement; (ii) an assessment of the extent to which these objectives are being achieved; (iii) a forecast of enrollment changes; (iv) a plan for projecting and managing enrollment changes including consideration of the consolidation of schools to provide for a more comprehensive and effective delivery of instructional services to students and economies in school operations; (v) an evaluation of the appropriateness of establishing regional programs and services in cooperation with neighboring school divisions; (vi) a plan for implementing such regional programs and services when appropriate; (vii) a technology plan designed to integrate educational technology into the instructional programs of the school division, including the school division’s career and technical education programs, consistent with, or as a part of, the comprehensive technology plan for Virginia adopted by the Board of Education; (viii) an assessment of the needs of the school division and evidence of community participation, including parental participation, in the development of the plan; (ix) any corrective action plan required pursuant to § 22.1-253.13:3; and (x) a plan for parent and family involvement to include building successful school and parent partnerships that shall be developed with staff and community involvement, including participation by parents.A report shall be presented by each school board to the public by November 1 of each odd-numbered year on the extent to which the objectives of the divisionwide comprehensive plan have been met during the previous two school years.

Each public school shall also prepare a comprehensive, unified, long-range plan, which the relevant school board shall consider in the development of its divisionwide comprehensive plan.

The Board of Education shall, in a timely manner, make available to local school boards information about where current Virginia school laws, Board regulations and revisions, and copies of relevant Opinions of the Attorney General of Virginia may be located online.

History.

1988, cc. 645, 682; 1990, cc. 820, 839; 1992, c. 591; 1998, c. 106; 2000, c. 867; 2001, c. 484; 2004, cc. 939, 955, 965; 2005, cc. 331, 450; 2007, c. 234.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s notes under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

Acts
2022, cc. 549 and
550, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective beginning with the 2024-2025 school year.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 867, in the fourth sentence of subsection B, substituted “integrate” for “make,” substituted “into the Standards of Learning and the curricula of the” for “an integral part of” and substituted “schools in Virginia” for “school education”; inserted “for educational technology” following “plan” in the fifth sentence of subsection B; and inserted “designed to integrate educational technology into the instructional programs of the school division,” near the end of the fourth sentence of subsection C.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 484 substituted “that” for “which” in the first sentence of subsections B and C; inserted “including career and technical education programs” at the end of the fourth sentence in subsection B; divided subsection C into three paragraphs, and in the present second paragraph thereof, inserted the clause (i) through (viii) designations, and inserted “including the school division’s career and technical education programs” in clause (vii); and made minor punctuation changes.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2004 amendment by c. 965, in the second paragraph of subsection C, added clause (ix) and made related changes.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 331 and 450 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 234 substituted “first improving student achievement, particularly the achievement of educationally at-risk students” for “improving student achievement” in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection A and in the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 549 and 550 are identical, and added the third paragraph of subsection B.

§ 22.1-253.13:6.
(For Effective Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 550, cl. 2) Standard 6. Planning and public involvement.

The Board of Education shall adopt a statewide comprehensive, unified, long-range plan based on data collection, analysis, and evaluation. Such plan shall be developed with statewide participation. The Board shall review the plan biennially and adopt any necessary revisions. The Board shall post the plan on the Department of Education’s website if practicable, and, in any case, shall make a hard copy of such plan available for public inspection and copying.

This plan shall include the objectives of public education in Virginia, including strategies for first improving student achievement, particularly the achievement of educationally at-risk students, then maintaining high levels of student achievement; an assessment of the extent to which these objectives are being achieved; a forecast of enrollment changes; and an assessment of the needs of public education in the Commonwealth. In the annual report required by § 22.1-18, the Board shall include an analysis of the extent to which these Standards of Quality have been achieved and the objectives of the statewide comprehensive plan have been met. The Board shall also develop, consistent with, or as a part of, its comprehensive plan, a detailed comprehensive, long-range plan to integrate educational technology into the Standards of Learning and the curricula of the public schools in Virginia, including career and technical education programs. The Board shall review and approve the comprehensive plan for educational technology and may require the revision of such plan as it deems necessary.

Each local school board shall adopt a divisionwide comprehensive, unified, long-range plan based on data collection, an analysis of the data, and how the data will be utilized to improve classroom instruction and student achievement. The plan shall be developed with staff and community involvement and shall include, or be consistent with, all other divisionwide plans required by state and federal laws and regulations. Each local school board shall review the plan biennially and adopt any necessary revisions. Prior to the adoption of any divisionwide comprehensive plan or revisions thereto, each local school board shall post such plan or revisions on the division’s Internet website if practicable, and, in any case, shall make a hard copy of the plan or revisions available for public inspection and copying and shall conduct at least one public hearing to solicit public comment on the divisionwide plan or revisions.

The divisionwide comprehensive plan shall include, but shall not be limited to, (i) the objectives of the school division, including strategies for first improving student achievement, particularly the achievement of educationally at-risk students, then maintaining high levels of student achievement; (ii) an assessment of the extent to which these objectives are being achieved; (iii) a forecast of enrollment changes; (iv) a plan for projecting and managing enrollment changes including consideration of the consolidation of schools to provide for a more comprehensive and effective delivery of instructional services to students and economies in school operations; (v) an evaluation of the appropriateness of establishing regional programs and services in cooperation with neighboring school divisions; (vi) a plan for implementing such regional programs and services when appropriate; (vii) a technology plan designed to integrate educational technology into the instructional programs of the school division, including the school division’s career and technical education programs, consistent with, or as a part of, the comprehensive technology plan for Virginia adopted by the Board of Education; (viii) an assessment of the needs of the school division and evidence of community participation, including parental participation, in the development of the plan; (ix) any corrective action plan required pursuant to § 22.1-253.13:3; and (x) a plan for parent and family involvement to include building successful school and parent partnerships that shall be developed with staff and community involvement, including participation by parents.

The divisionwide comprehensive plan shall also include a divisionwide literacy plan for pre-kindergarten through grade three. The Board shall issue guidance on the contents of such plans. The Department shall develop a template for such plans. Each divisionwide literacy plan shall follow such template and address how the local school board will align (i) literacy professional development, (ii) core reading and literacy curriculum, and (iii) screening, supplemental instruction, and interventions with evidence-based literacy instruction practices aligned with science-based reading research and how the school board will support parents to support the literacy development of their children. When developing such divisionwide literacy plan, each local school board shall use programs from the lists developed by the Department pursuant to subsection C of § 22.1-253.13:5 and subdivision H 2 of § 22.1-253:1 or seek approval from the Department for the use of alternative programs that consist of evidence-based literacy instruction and align with science-based reading research.

A report shall be presented by each school board to the public by November 1 of each odd-numbered year on the extent to which the objectives of the divisionwide comprehensive plan have been met during the previous two school years.

Each public school shall also prepare a comprehensive, unified, long-range plan, which the relevant school board shall consider in the development of its divisionwide comprehensive plan.

The Board of Education shall, in a timely manner, make available to local school boards information about where current Virginia school laws, Board regulations and revisions, and copies of relevant Opinions of the Attorney General of Virginia may be located online.

History.

1988, cc. 645, 682; 1990, cc. 820, 839; 1992, c. 591; 1998, c. 106; 2000, c. 867; 2001, c. 484; 2004, cc. 939, 955, 965; 2005, cc. 331, 450; 2007, c. 234; 2022, cc. 549, 550.

§ 22.1-253.13:7.
Standard 7. School board policies.

Each local school board shall develop policies and procedures to address complaints of sexual abuse of a student by a teacher or other school board employee.

Each local school board shall maintain and follow up-to-date policies. All school board policies shall be reviewed at least every five years and revised as needed.

Each local school board shall ensure that policies are developed giving consideration to the views of teachers, parents, and other concerned citizens and addressing the following:

A system of two-way communication between employees and the local school board and its administrative staff whereby matters of concern can be discussed in an orderly and constructive manner;

The selection and evaluation of all instructional materials purchased by the school division, with clear procedures for handling challenged controversial materials;

The standards of student conduct and attendance and enforcement procedures designed to provide that public education be conducted in an atmosphere free of disruption and threat to persons or property and supportive of individual rights;

School-community communications and community involvement;

Guidelines to encourage parents to provide instructional assistance to their children in the home, which may include voluntary training for the parents of children in grades K through three;

Information about procedures for addressing concerns with the school division and recourse available to parents pursuant to § 22.1-87;

A cooperatively developed procedure for personnel evaluation appropriate to tasks performed by those being evaluated; and

Grievances, dismissals, etc., of teachers, and the implementation procedure prescribed by the General Assembly and the Board of Education, as provided in Article 3 (§ 22.1-306 et seq.) of Chapter 15, and the maintenance of copies of such procedures.

A current copy of all school division policies and regulations approved by the local school board, including the Student Conduct Policy, shall be posted on the division’s website and shall be available to employees and to the public. School boards shall ensure that printed copies of such policies and regulations are available as needed to citizens who do not have online access.

An annual announcement shall be made in each division at the beginning of the school year and, for parents of students enrolling later in the academic year, at the time of enrollment, advising the public that the policies are available in such places.

History.

1988, cc. 645, 682, 754; 1990, c. 291; 1992, c. 591; 2004, cc. 939, 955; 2007, c. 234; 2008, cc. 474, 827; 2013, c. 301.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1988 act, c. 754, having been 22.1-253.13:1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s notes under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 234 rewrote the last paragraph of subsection B.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 474 and 827 are nearly identical, and added subsection A; redesignated former subsections A, B and C as subsections B, C and E, respectively; and inserted the subsection D designation and “required by this section” in subsection D.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 301, in subsection D, substituted “all school” for “the school” and “and regulations approved by the local school board” for “required by this section,” and inserted the last occurrence of “and regulations.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Discrimination. —

Because the power to protect students and employees from discrimination in the public school system is a power fairly implied from the express grant of authority to school boards under Article VIII, § 7 of the Constitution of Virginia and from the specific authority granted to boards by the General Assembly in §§ 22.1-28, 22.1-78 and 22.1-253.13:7, the Dillon Rule does not prevent school boards from amending their antidiscrimination policies to prohibit discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation and gender identity. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Adam P. Ebbin, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-080, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (3/4/15).

School safety. —

Virginia law authorizes school resource officers and certain school security officers to possess firearms on public school grounds as school safety personnel, but such authority is not extended to teachers and administrators.
See opinion of Attorney General to Ms. Shannon Dion, Director, Virginia Department of Criminal Justice Services, 18-042,
(8/28/2018).